Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-967
Comprehensive treatment of pediatric feeding disorders; amendment to state medicaid plan; department; duties.

(1) On or before July 1, 2010, the Department of Health and Human Services shall submit an application to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services amending the state medicaid plan to provide for medicaid payments for the comprehensive treatment of pediatric feeding disorders through interdisciplinary treatment.

(2) For purposes of this section, interdisciplinary treatment means the collaboration of medicine, psychology, nutrition science, speech therapy, occupational therapy, social work, and other appropriate medical and behavioral disciplines in an integrated program.

(3) This section terminates on January 1, 2015, unless extended by action of the Legislature.

Laws 2009, LB342, § 2.
January 1, 2015